Illinois, session 104th, HB3935.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $13,051,800, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Dram Shop Fund to 7the Liquor Control Commission for operational expenses. 8    Section 10. The following named sums, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 10purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Liquor 11Control Commission:12PAYABLE FROM DRAM SHOP FUND13  For Refunds...........................................5,00014  For expenses related to the15   Retailer Education Program.........................517,80016  For the purpose of operating the17   Beverage Alcohol Sellers and18   Servers Education and Training19   (BASSET) Program...................................301,80020    Total                                            $824,600 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1,   HB3935- 2 -OMB104 00097 LAH 10097 b12025.